USR-to-hindi/apertium_hn_canonical_LC.dix
<pardef n="so/__v">

<!-- verbal noun -->
<e><p><l>nA</l><r>nA<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="case:d"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ne</l><r>nA<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="case:o"/></r></p></e>





<e><p><l>wA_huA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>wI_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_wA_huA"/></r></p></e>


<e><p><l>yA_huA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ye_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:d"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I_huI</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p" /><s n="case:o"/><s n="tam:adj_yA_huA"/></r></p></e>





 <e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_hue</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:adv_we_hue"/></r></p></e>

 <e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>
 <e><p><l>we_rahanA_hE</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:we_rahanA_hE"/></r></p></e>



<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oo</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oo</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oo</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oo</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ie</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>


<e><p><l>yA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>yA</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ye</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>ye</l><r><s n="cat:v"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="Bigo"><i>Bigo</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bilo"><i>bilo</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
<e lm="bo"><i>bo</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
<e lm="Do"><i>Do</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
<e lm="Ko"><i>Ko</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
<e lm="piro"><i>piro</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
<e lm="ro"><i>ro</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
<e lm="saFjo"><i>saFjo</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
<e lm="sazjo"><i>sazjo</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
<e lm="so"><i>so</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
<e lm="Xo"><i>Xo</i><par n="so/__v"/></e>
